District of Columbia statutes.
16-574

Judgment creditor to file receipts, in court, of amount collected.

(a)

The judgment creditor shall:

(1)

file with the clerk of the court, every three months after the serving of an attachment upon an employer-garnishee, a receipt showing the amount received and the balance due under the attachment as of the date of filing;

(2)

file a final receipt with the court and furnish a copy thereof to the employee-garnishee; and

(3)

obtain a vacation of the attachment within 20 days after the attachment has been satisfied.

(b)

If the judgment creditor fails to file any of the receipts prescribed by subsection (a) of this section, an interested party may move the court to compel the defaulting judgment creditor to appear in court and make an accounting forthwith. The court may, in its discretion, enter judgment for any damages, including a reasonable attorney’s fee suffered by, and tax costs in favor of, the party filing the motion to compel the accounting.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 556, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-574.
1973 Ed., § 16-574.